Hawaii statutes.
§412:5A-213 Improper fixing of
commodity prices. Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any
international banking corporation who knowingly uses or conspires to use the
credit, funds, or power of the international banking corporation to fix or control
the price of any commodities shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
pursuant to sections 706-663 and 706‑640. [L 1993, c 350,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next